tex/context/patterns/lang-de.pat
yan2g
y1ank
y1ät
y1b
y1c2
y2chi
y3chis
ych3n
y1d4
y1e
y2ef
yen4n
y2ere
y2es.
yes2p
ye2th
y1f2
y1g
ygi2
ygie5
yg2l
y1h
yhr2
y1i4
y1j
y1k2
yke3n
yk3s2
y1l
y2l3a2m
yl4ante
yl3c
y4le.
yli4n
yloni1
yl3s2
y2l1u
yma4t
ymp4
ym2pha
ympi1
y2n1o
yno4d
ynt2
y1nu
y1of
yom2
yon4i
y1ont
y1os
y1ou
y1p
ypa2
yp3an
ype2
y2pf
y3ph
y2p1in
ypo3
y4p3s
y1r
y3r2e
y3ri
yri2a
yri1e
y3r4o
yrr2
ys2an
ys2c
yse1
y3s2h
y4s3l
ysme3
ys2po
ys1pr
ys3t4
y1s4ty
y2s1u2
y3s2z
y1t2
y2te.
y2tes
y3to1
yu2r
yure3
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z2
2z3a2b
zab3l
za1c
2z1a2d
2z1af
za3gr
3z2ah
zah4ner
2z3a2k
2z1all
2z1am
z1an
za2na
2z3anf
3zani
3z2ank
zan4kl
2z3anl
2zarb
2zarc
2z1arm
z1arti
zar2tr
2z1arz
z1as
za1st4
2z3at3
3zaub
z1au2f
z3aug
3zaun
zä2
2z1ä4c
3z2äh
2z1äm
2zängs
z1ärg
z1ärm
4z3b4
zbü1b
zbübe3
2z3c
2z3d2
zdan2
zdä1
2z1e2ben
2zecho
ze1e
2z1eff
zehe4
zehen1
zeik4
zei3la
zeile4
2z1ein
zei1s6
zei3sk
zeist4
zei2t1a
zeit5end
zei4t3er
zei2tr
zeit3ri
ze2l1a2
ze2len
ze2l1er
ze2l1in
zell2a
zels2
zel3sz
zel3t2h
zel3tr
zelu2
2z1emp
5zen.
ze4n3ac
ze2nä
zen3n
ze2no
zens2e
zen4sem
zen5s4tr
zent3s
zen4z3er
z2er.
zer3a
ze2re2b
2z1ergä
4z3ergeb
z3erhal
2zerhö
zerin4t
zerk2
z2erl.
2zerlö
z2ern
zer4neb
zer4n3ei
2z1erq
zers2
2z1ersa
4z3erste
4z3erstr
3zert
zert1a4
zer4t3ag
zert4an
zer6tere
zer6terl
zer4tin
zer6trau
4zerwei
2z1erz
3z2erza
ze2sä
ze3sc
zes1e
zes1i
ze3sku
ze2sp
zessen4
zes6s5end
zes2sp
zes2st
ze2s3t
ze3sta
ze2tr
2zetts
2z1ex
2z1f4
2z1g2
zger2a
2z1h
z2hen
zi3alo
zi3ar
zi2dei
zid3r
zie4lei
zi1erh
ziers1
zi1es.
zil2e
2z1imp
zim4t3
zin2e
zin3ei
zin4er
2z1inf
2z1inh
zin1it
zin2sa
zin4ser
4zinsuf
2z1inv
zi2o3
zi3op
zirk2
zirk6s
zi3s2z
zi1t2h
ziv2
2z1j
2z1k4
2z1l2
2z1m2
2z3n2
2z1ob
2z1of
zo2gl
2z1oh
3zol
zon4ter
zo2o
2z1ope
z1or
zo2ri
zor4ne
2z1osz
2zö2f
z1öl
2zön
2z3p4
2z1q
2z3r2
4z1s2
z3sa
z3sh
z3sk
z3sz
2z1t
z2t1au
z4tehe
z3t2her
zt3ho
z3tic
zt1ins
z3tö
zt3rec
zt3s2
z3tü
zu1
zu3a
zub4
3zuc
zu4ch
zu3cke
zud4
zudi4
zu2el
zu3f4
zu2g1ar
zu4gent
zu3gl
zug1un
2z1uhr
zu3k
2z1um.
zumen2
2zumf
2zumg
2zuml
2zumr
2z1ums
zun2e
zung4
2zunt
zup2fi
zu3r2a
z1urk
2z1url
2z1urs
2z1urt
zu3s4
zu5t
zut2a
zuz2
2züb
zür1c
2z1v
zw2
z1wac
2zwag
2zwah
zwan2d1
z2wang
z1war
2zwas
4zwäl
2zweg
2zweh
z2weig
2z1wel
2z1wen
2z1wer
z2werg
2z1wes
2zwet
2zwir
z2wit
2z1wo
z1wör
z1wur
2z1wü
4z1z
z3z4a
zzi1s4
z3z2o
zz2ö}
